Maine, session 132, LD1518.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15004, first ¶, as amended by PL 1989, c. 425, §3, is further
amended to read:
The unexpended balance of all money raised by a school administrative unit, received
from the State for general-purpose aid or for other educational programs; from the Federal
Government directly or from the Federal Government through the State; from tuition
payments made by other units, the State, or by individuals; and other receipts for school
purposes shall must be carried forward and credited to spent by the unit for educational
programs for in the ensuing year.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15689-B, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2021, c. 213, §1, is
further amended to read:
6. Balance of allocations. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, general
operating fund balances at the end of a school administrative unit's fiscal year must be
carried forward to meet the unit's needs in the next year or over a period not to exceed 3
years. Unallocated balances in excess of 5% of the previous fiscal year's school budget
must be used to reduce the state and local share of the total allocation for the purpose of
computing state subsidy spent to fund educational programs. School boards may carry
forward unallocated balances in excess of 5% of the previous year's school budget and
disburse spend these funds for educational programs in the next year or over a period not
to exceed 3 years. For fiscal years 2021-22, 2022-23, 2023-24 and 2024-25 only,
unallocated balances in excess of 9% of the previous fiscal year's school budget must be
used to reduce the state and local share of the total allocation for the purpose of computing
state subsidy and school boards may carry forward unallocated balances in excess of 9%
of the previous fiscal year's school budget and disburse these funds in the next year or over
a period not to exceed 3 years The unallocated funds must be held separate and apart from
all other money, funds and accounts.